 In the meantime, we have mice that are 4 months old and have not yet developed diabetes.
 Professor Ehud Ur in the Department of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia,
 Like some other experts, he is sceptical about the question of whether his diabetes can be cured,
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Nobel Prize in literature at the Swedish Academy,
 And at the moment, we are doing nothing . I have called and emailed his closest aide,
 Earlier, Jamie Siminoff, the Ceo of Ring, said the company was founded when his doorbell from the store was not audible in his garage.
 He said he made a Wifi-Doorbell.
 Siminoff said that sales increased after he appeared on Shark Tank in two thousand and thirteen,
 At the end of 2017, Siminoff was seen on the Teleshopping channel, QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with the ADT Corporation,
 One experimental vaccine appears to be able to reduce Ebola deaths, but so far no drugs have been clearly shown to be effective in treating existing infections.
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, was initially promising in the field,
 ZMapp was a control in the PALM trial, so scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatments to it.
 The U S . Olympic Committee has the support of USA Gymnastics and understands that it is necessary for the Olympic family to promote a safe place for all of our athletes.
 We are in agreement with the USOC's statement that it is best for our athletes and clubs and their sport to make meaningful changes to our organization instead of taking away certifications.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that can shed more light on how the abuse that was so bravely described by the survivors of Larry Nassar could have gone on for so long,
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal,
 During the sixty s, Brzezinski worked as an advisor for John F . Kennedy and then for the administration of Lyndon B . Johnson.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy during the 1976 election campaign,
 As a member of the National security Council, he was involved in the Camp David accords in 1978, the stabilization of the U S . China relations at the end of the decade,
 The film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma stone was nominated for all the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for best actor and best actress.
 Under the other nominations were the categories best film, director, cinematography, costume design, film editing, original music, production design,
 The numbers Audition and City of Stars from the film were nominated for best original song,
 In a statement from his press Secretary,
 The announcement came after a telephone call between Trump and the Turkish President, Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 The Turks also said in the communique that they would guard the captured ISIS fighters, whom Europe did not want to take back.
 This not only proves the widespread theory that at least some dinosaurs had feathers,
 According to scientists, the feathers of this bird were chestnut-brown with a pale or carotenoid-colored under-surface.
 The find also gives insight into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 The researchers concluded that the rachis was probably a later evolutionary development,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but to regulate the temperature or to look good.
 Despite the fact that it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the researchers suggested that the monster had the feathers of an adult, not a chick.
 Yesterday, a car bomb exploded at the main police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and wounding more than twenty other people.
 Among the wounded are nineteen police officers, said the governor.
 The police suspect a Daesh militant,
 From this it was clear that the sun follows the same basic principles as other stars: all star activity in the system is based solely on the brightness and rotation of the stars.
 The brightness and rotation are used to determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma rotation.
 The smaller the number of Rossby waves, the less active the star is in terms of magnetic reversals.
 Iwasaki ran into trouble at various points during his trip.
 Pirates robbed him, a rabid dog attacked him in Tibet, he escaped from a forced marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard is compatible with both frequencies, 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz.
 If the base station has double radios, it makes this backwards compatibility with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g possible.
 Speeds of 802.11n are substantially faster than those of its predecessors with a maximum theoretical capacity of 600 Mbit.
 Duvall is married with two children and made no great impression on Miller, to whom the story is related.
 On a request for comment, Millar responded, quote, I was preparing, so I didn't really listen to him.
 We are doing our utmost to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP in 2020 by a considerable margin compared with the level in 2005.
 He has not set any figures for the cuts, because he says that they will be determined on the basis of China's economic output.
 Hu urged developing countries to avoid the old way of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 He added that they should not be asked to take on obligations that are beyond their development, level, responsibility and ability.
 The Iraqi study group presented its report at 12.00 GMT.
 The warning is that no one can guarantee that no single act in Iraq at this time will end sectarian warfare, increasing violence or the tendency towards chaos.
 At the beginning of the report, there is a plea for open discussion and consensus building in the us over Mideast policy.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the current administration's policy towards Iraq, and strongly recommends a different course of action.
 The report contains 78 recommendations, the first of which is that this year diplomatic action should be taken to protect the Iraqi borders against hostile powers and to restore diplomatic relations with neighbouring countries.
 Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, Senator and the wife of the Argentine President, announced last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers away from Buenos Aires,
 Kirchner announced her intention to run for the Presidency at the Argentine theatre, where she had launched her campaign for the Senate in 2005 as a member of the Buenos Aires provincial legislature.
 The debate was sparked by a discussion about investing and rebuilding after Hurricane Katrina,
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction work is directed at the awarding of reconstruction contracts to alleged insiders from Washington.
 The funeral was attended by more than four million people in Rome.
 There were so many people present that not everyone could get into the funeral on St . Peter's square.
 There were large television screens set up in different places in Rome so that people could watch the ceremony.
 Similar setups were made in many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, and here a lot of people looked at it.
 Historians have criticized earlier FBI policies for focusing their resources on easily solved crimes,
 As of fiscal year two thousand and five, the Congress funded the initiative against obscenity and declared that the FBI should deploy ten agents to combat adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score of the innings with 70 runs in just 41 balls, by hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 In the middle order, batting well, were the batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, who scored a hundred runs together.
 But after India lost the wicket of their captain,
 President of the United States, George W . Bush, arrived in the morning of November sixteen in Singapore for a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was received by Wong Kan Seng, the vice-president of Singapore, and discussed problems in the area of trade and terrorism with the Prime Minister of Singapore, Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush spoke to a crowd this week about increasing trade relations with Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper has agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee for all parties to review,
 During the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton asked for changes to the conservative party's environment act,
 Since the Federal Government has taken over funding from the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the government and some Federal parliamentarians have criticized this law as a stunt during the early period of the Federal election, which is held in November.
 But the government of John Howard has said that it is only trying to prevent the Tasmanian government from cutting back on the hospital's funding by an additional forty five million dollars.
 According to the latest bulletin, the sea level is showing some clear tsunami activity near Pago Pago and Niue.
 In Tonga, there was no major damage or serious injury, although the power was out for some time, and the Tongan authorities were unable to receive the tsunami warning from the PTWC.
 The warnings were lifted, but still, fourteen schools in Hawaii were closed Wednesday,
 George W . Bush, the leader of the United States, welcomed the announcement.
 A spokesman for Bush, Gordon Johndroe, described the North Korean promise as a big step forward in our goal to denuclearize the Korean peninsula.
 The tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical storm Jerry,
 According to the National Hurricane center,
 According to the U S . Army Corps of engineers, six inches of rain could potentially cause the earlier damaged levees to break.
 In the Ninth Ward, the water during Hurricane Katrina stood at more than 20 feet high,
 The water flows over a piece of land one hundred feet wide over the dike.
 The Commons-Beheerder Adam Cuerden expressed his frustration over the removal last month during his conversation with Wikinews.
 First, he lied to us from the beginning by saying it was for legal reasons.
 The frustrations within the community have resulted in the current attempts to formulate a policy regarding the sexual content of the site that hosts millions of pieces of media content with an open license.
 The completed work was primarily theoretical in nature, but the program is written for the simulation of observations of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The team was looking for the effect that would be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter of the universe and that of the Milky way.
 Similar to how the moon exerts a gravitational pull on the earth, which leads to tides,
 The researchers concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way that it affects ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, the majority of the dark matter in a Galaxy is found in a halo,
 On television footage, you can see white smoke coming out of the plant.
 Local authorities are giving the following warning to residents who live near the plant,
 The Japanese nuclear agency reports that radioactive cesium and jodine were found at the plant.
 The authorities suspect that this indicates that containers with uranium fuel rods may have been damaged and leaking.
 XDR-TB was discovered by Dr . Tony Moll in the KwaZulu-Natal province of South Africa.
 He said in an interview that the new variant is very, very alarming and worrying because of the very high death rate.
 Dr Moll thinks some of the patients contracted the disease in the hospital, including two nurses from the hospital.
 A single infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts in a year.
 The percentage of XDR-TB among all tuberculosis patients still seems low at 6000 out of 330,000 infected people at any one time in South Africa.
 The satellites, which weighed both more than 1,000 pounds and traveled at about 17,500 miles per hour,
 Scientists say that the collision created a huge explosion.
 They are still trying to figure out how big the collision was and how it will affect the earth.
 The United States Strategic command of the United States Department of Defense is tracking the debris.
 On a public Website, the result of the plot analysis is posted.
 According to official sources in Ohio, a doctor from the children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is being charged with aggravated murder after the body of her mother was found in the trunk of her car on Wednesday.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in his T-shirt, underwear and heavily medicated state,
 She sent officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was parked 500 feet away.
 At this point, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian,
 The police said that the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease were reported at the end of July.
 Pigs carry the disease and transmit it to humans via mosquitoes.
 The government of India has, in response to the epidemic, decided to deploy pig hunters in the worst affected parts of the country,
 The government has promised several million encephalitis vaccines so that health authorities can prepare for next year.
 The plans to deliver vaccines this year to the places that have been hit hardest have been delayed because of a lack of funding and the low priority of other diseases.
 Słania moved to Sweden in 1956, where he worked for three years as a chief engraver at the Swedish post office.
 He produced more than 1000 stamps for Sweden and another 28 countries.
 His work is recognized for its quality and detail, and his name is a household name among stamp collectors.
 The beautiful stamp, the great deeds by Swedish Kings, made by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl in 2000,
 He has also created the portraits of the Minister-President on the front of the new Canadian five and one hundred dollar banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to the hospital where he died shortly thereafter.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed from the scene of the accident around noon,
 A garage employee near the accident said, quote, there were children waiting to cross the street,
 They all ran back from the scene of the accident.
 Other topics on the agenda include the protection of the world's remaining forests and the sharing of technology to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN also hopes to set up a fund to help countries that are already suffering from the effects of global warming.
 Flood-Resistant houses, more efficient water management and diversification of crops could be the investments that the money is used for.
 Some people tried to stop women from speaking out about women's health, but these attempts were unsuccessful.
 Based on the many positive comments and support from both men and women who found that contraception should be considered as a medical necessity.
 When the fighting stopped after the wounded had been transported to the hospital,
 Negotiators have been trying to get the situation back on track, but the demands of the prisoners are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 23:00 local time, the inmates set fire to the courtyard.
 Agents in riot gear soon entered the garden and drove the prisoners into a corner with tear gas.
 The fire was brought under control at 11:35,
 The seasonal flooding that used to spread sediment throughout the river ceased after the dam was built in 1963.
 This sediment was needed to create sandbars and beaches, which served as habitats for wildlife.
 Two species became extinct, and two other species are threatened with extinction, including the Gila cypha.
 After the flood, the water level will only rise a few meters, but officials hope that this is enough to restore the eroded sandbanks downstream.
 There is no tsunami warning issued, and the geophysical agency in Jakarta says that there is no tsunami warning because the earthquake was not of the magnitude of 6.5, which is the minimum requirement to issue a tsunami warning.
 There was no tsunami threat, but people were in a panic and left their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey, with tears in her eyes, said goodbye, she promised her fans that she would return.
 I take no leave.
 The Namibian Presidential and Parliamentary elections were won by the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba,
 At the moment, the SWAPO party, the South West African people's Organisation,
 The coalition and Afghan troops went into the area to secure the location and another coalition aircraft was sent in to provide support.
 The helicopter crashed high in mountainous terrain and it is suspected that this was caused by hostile fire.
 Attempts to locate the site of the accident are hampered by the bad weather and the rough terrain.
 According to the medical charity, Doctors without Borders, and the world health Organisation,
 Richard Veerman, spokesperson for Doctors without Borders, says,
 It was a beautiful day when the game started at 10 am,
 The tournament favorites, South Africa, started off well with a comfortable win of 26-00 against the fifth seeded Zambia.
 Although they played very stiffly against their Southern neighbours, South Africa improved in the tournament.
 They were noted for their tight defense, control of the ball, and outstanding teamwork and were clearly the most important opponent.
 Amsterdam city officials and staffers at the Anne Frank House say the tree has a fungus and is a danger to public health,
 The tree was to be cut down on Tuesday, but a court order stopped this.
 The entrances to the cave were called the seven sisters and all had a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrarred images show that the temperature at night and during the day is different and show that it is probably caves.
 During the day they are cooler than the surrounding surface, and at night they are warmer.
 The thermal behavior of the deep holes is not as stable as that of large caves on earth, which often have a fairly constant temperature.
 In France, voting is a very simple process,
 Officials first check the voter's identity, then the voter slides the envelope into the ballot box and then signs his or her name.
 The process is relatively well-defined in the French electoral code.
 Voting booths have to be transparent since 1988, so that both voters and observers can see that no envelopes are added to the booths at the beginning of the vote and that no other envelopes are added than those of registered and authorized voters.
 The candidates may send representatives to witness each part of the process,
 The Eee PC was launched worldwide for cost saving and various functionalities, and was extensively covered in the Taipei IT month of 2007.
 The consumer market for laptop computers, however, is very diverse and has changed since ASUS won the Taiwan Sustainable Award in 2007 from the executive yuan of the Republic of China.
 The Website of the station describes the show as an old school radio drama with a new and unheard of twist.
 In the beginning, the show was only broadcast via the long-running radio Website Toginetradio,
 At the end of 2015, the AstroNet radio station was established.
 Originally, the series featured local amateur voice actors from the Eastern part of Texas.
 The widespread looting went on, allegedly, at night because there were no law enforcement officers in the streets of Bishkek.
 Bishkek was described by one person as an anarchist state, where gangs were roaming the streets and shops were being looted.
 In Bishkek, the blame for the unrest was placed by several people at the feet of the demonstrators from the South.
 In the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in the South African town of Rustenburg,
 The final score was a one point win, twenty one to twenty, ending the All Blacks' fifteen game winning streak.
 And finally, after five losses in a row,
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The last game of the series is next week in Ellis Park in Johannesburg,
 On Monday, at 10:08 a M, a moderate earthquake shook Western Montana.
 There were no reports of damage at the United States Geological Survey or the National earthquake information center.
 The earthquake occurred about 20 kilometers north-northwest of Dillon, and about 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 Monday a dead wild duck was found in the marshes near Lyon in the East of France, which was found to be infected with the deadly H5N1 bird flu virus.
 After Italy, Greece, Bulgaria, Slovenia, Slovenia, Germany and Austria, France is the seventh country in the European Union where this virus is present.
 The outbreaks in Kuwait and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers complained to God about the widespread killing, destruction and terrorizing of many millions of earthly creatures.
 Agnost Chambers says his court case is a farce and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The French opera is a story by Camille Saint-Saens and is about an artist whose life is controlled by a love of drugs and Japan.
 As a result, performers smoke cannabis on the stage, and the theater itself encourages the audience to do so.
 Former Speaker of the House Newt Gingrich, Texas governor Rick Perry, and Congresswoman Michele Bachmann,
 When the results were announced, Gingrich praised Santorum, but criticized Romney,
 Perry stated that he would return to Texas to review the results of the primary vote that night,
 The winner of the Ames Straw poll in August, Bachmann, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was then transported to the Ronald Reagan UCLA medical center, where he died.
 According to sources, he was in his twenties . I was not present or directly involved in this unfortunate incident, but I'm holding the family of the victim in my thoughts.
 The photographer had parked his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and was attempting to take pictures of the traffic control before he crossed the street and took more pictures,
 The driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer is unlikely to be prosecuted,
 There are only eighteen medals awarded each day, so many countries are left off the podium.
 Among them are the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen was ninth yesterday in the standing event for women in the Super-G,
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley finished eleventh in the men's standing Super-G,
 Arly Velasquez of Mexico finished in fifteenth place in the men's Super-G,
 The blind skiing Polish man Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska were thirteenth in the Super-G for men.
 The UN peacekeeping force that came to Haiti after the earthquake of 2010 is being blamed for the spread of the disease that has broken out in the camp of the troops.
 It was found that the waste from the UN camp was not properly treated, and that bacteria were able to enter the Artibonite River,
 Haiti had not had cholera since the eighteen hundred s, until the troops arrived.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti spoke about independent students who said the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion had brought the disease without knowing it to Haiti.
 According to Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease,
 The patient is in stable condition at Howard University hospital.
 The patient had been to Nigeria, where the Ebola virus was already present in small numbers.
 The hospital followed the protocol for infection control, including isolating the patient to prevent others from being infected.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon worked in various roles on a number of shows.
 He appeared in the eighty s in shows like Taxi, Cheers, and the Tracy Ullman show.
 In 1989, he worked with Brooks and Groening on the Simpsons and was responsible for the first writing team.
 After his departure from the series in 1993, he remained a producer,
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua had earlier reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 And from later reports, it turns out that there was a bomb threat in the plane, which is why it was diverted to Kandahar.
 First reports indicate that the plane was diverted to Urumqi after it was not allowed to make an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Airplane crashes are common in Iran, which has an outdated fleet for both civilian and military operations.
 And by international sanctions, no new planes can be bought.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, the worst airplane crash in Iran in years,
 In the same month, a passenger plane crashed into a wall in Mashhad, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith has canceled the rest of their tour.
 The tour of the rock band would run through the United States and Canada until the sixteenth of September.
 They canceled the tour after singer Steven Tyler was injured when he fell off the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tiebreak, after both men had given up no points at all in the set when they were serving.
 Del Potro had an early break in the second set, but here, too, a tiebreak followed after it was 6-6.
 Potro was treated on the spot for his shoulder, but he was able to continue the match.
 The local start time of the program was 20.30 hours.
 Famous singers from all over the country sang bhajans or religious songs at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The evening started with the singer Sanju Sharma, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary.
 Lakkha Singh then sang the bhajans.
 A hundred and eight plates were served to Baba Shyam,
 Lakkha Singh has also presented the Chhappan bhog bhajan,
 On Thursday, Satoru Iwata, the director of Nintendo, revealed the design of the Controller for the new Nintendo Revolution.
 It's like a TV remote control,
 With it, players control actions and movements in Video games by moving the device through the air.
 Shortly after the start, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and was out of the race.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso led most of the race, but lost the position directly after his pit stop, probably because of a badly placed right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher did not finish his race long after Alonso, due to the damage to the wheel suspension caused by the many duels during the race.
 In a transcript of the news conference, he said, quote, she was a cute little girl with a nice voice.
 I was moved every time we rehearsed it, from the bottom of my heart.
 On an internal camera, about 3 minutes after launch,
 It is believed that these did not cause any damage to the shuttle.
 The director of NASA's shuttle program, N . Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam had fallen after the period of time that we had been concerned about.
 After five minutes the wind starts, and a minute later the wind reaches already about 70 km per hour.
 I lost my sister and her friend, and when I tried to get to them, people were just jumping over them in their wheelchairs.
 The NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating as normal.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reports that the earthquake has caused no problems and that in the Shika nuclear power plant, reactors 1 and 2 have been stopped.
 According to reports, there are 9,400 households in the region without water and about 100 without power.
 Several roads have been damaged, the rail service has been suspended in the affected areas, and the Prefecture of the airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed for a longer period.
 One bomb has exploded outside the office where the governor-general works.
 Within a period of two hours, three more bombs were detonated in the vicinity of government buildings.
 In some reports, the official death toll is put at eight,
 In urine samples from pets that had died after eating contaminated pet food, both cyanuric acid and melamine were found.
 Researchers at the University found that the two connections react with each other,
 Scientists found out that crystals are formed in cat urine when you add Melanin and Cyanuric acid to it.
 The composition of these crystals has similarities to that of the urine of the affected pets, compared to infrared spectroscopy.
 I don't know if you realize this, but most of the goods from the Middle American countries came into this country without paying any tax.
 And yet, eighty percent of our goods were taxed according to tariffs from countries in the Middle East.
 I found that very odd, and I thought it was unfair.
 What I am trying to say is that you treat us as we treat you.
 Arnold Schwarzenegger, the governor of California, has signed a bill into law banning the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 Under this law, violent Video games that are sold in the state of California must have a '18' sticker on them, and selling to a minor is punishable by a fine of up to one thousand dollars per offense.
 Kier Starmer QC, the director of the CPS, has this morning said that he will prosecute both Pryce and Huhne.
 Huhne has resigned, and in the cabinet, MP Ed Davey is his replacement, while MP Norman Lamb is expected to take over as Minister of Trade.
 Huhne and Pryce are expected to appear before the Westminster Magistrates' Court on 16 February.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback was the driver of the vehicle.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in the arm and the jaw, and Kristoffer Schneider had to undergo a reconstructive facial operation.
 The weapon of Uka failed as he pointed it at the head of a fifth man,
 Schneider gave his statement via Video-Link from a U S . Air Force base in the country from which he had come.
 In addition to the Wednesday event, Carpanedo also competed in two individual races of the championship.
 Her first was the slalom, where she got a did not finish in her first run,
 In the other race she competed in, the standing Grote Slalom, she was tenth of the ladies, with a combined time of 4:41:30,
 Four skiers from the women's slalom group were unable to finish their runs, and forty five of the one hundred and seventeen skiers in the giant slalom failed to place.
 The stolen laptop and mobile phone have been recovered by the Madhya Pradesh police.
 According to assistant inspector general D. K. Arya, five of the men who raped the Swedish woman have been arrested and her mobile phone and laptop have been found.
 Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar are the suspects.
 According to police Commissioner Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the suspects had their faces covered when they appeared in court.
 Three people were in the house when the car hit the house,
 The driver, however, was seriously injured in the head.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while the emergency services tried to free the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially admitted to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya is since then in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court convicted for the murder of her son.
 She is in custody awaiting the charge and the trial, but the eye witness report is possibly doctored because her story is published many times.
 This is standard practice in the rest of the UK, but justice in Scotland works differently and courts have deemed the publication of photographs as potentially prejudicial.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee remarks that,
 The crown office has taken over the overall control of the investigation and has told journalists that no further statements will be made until charges are made.
 According to sources, the document refers to a settlement, something that the Palestinians have long wanted on the basis of the borders before the war in the Middle East in 1967.
 Other topics that were discussed were the future status of Jerusalem, a city that is holy to both peoples, and the problems in the West Bank.
 Israel demands a permanent military presence in the valley for ten years, but the PA is only willing to accept a presence of five years.
 Shooters in the supplementary test for pest control had to be closely watched by gamekeepers,
 In collaboration with the NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of park conservation and heritage at the NPWS,
 Martelly swore in a nine-member provisional electoral Council of the CEP.
 In the past four years, Martelly has won the CEP five times.
 Last month, the Presidential Commission recommended the dismissal of the previous National Election Commission,
 The Commission was set up by Martelly in response to the widespread protests against the government that have been taking place since October.
 The sometimes violent protests were sparked by the delay in holding elections, some of which had been due since 2011.
 There are about sixty cases reported of overheated iPods that resulted in six fires and four people with minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said it was aware of the 27 incidents linked to the devices.
 Last week, METI announced that apple had reported 34 additional incidents of overheating that the company had deemed not serious.
 The report was delayed, the Ministry said,
 Mariana was hit by the earthquake at 07.19 local time,
 The office of emergency management of the Northern Mariana Islands said that there were no reports of damage.
 And the National Tsunami Warning center said there was no tsunami warning.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former Filipino policeman has hijacked a bus full of Hong Kong tourists.
 With his M16 rifle, Rolando Mendoza shot at the tourists.
 Several hostages have been rescued and at least six fatalities have been confirmed.
 Six hostages were released earlier, including the children and the elderly, and the Filipino photographers.
 Later, the photographers returned in exchange for an older woman who had to go to the toilet,
 Liggins went into medicine, following in his father's footsteps.
 Trained as a midwife, he started work in 1959 at the National Women's hospital in Auckland.
 When he was working at the hospital, Liggins did research on premature birth in his spare time.
 His research showed that the maturation of the baby's lungs was speeded up by the administration of a hormone.
 Xinhua has reported that government researchers found two black boxes with flight recorders on Wednesday.
 And even fellow astronauts paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said, Luna was the first ever queen of extreme . My first manager.
 Dustin Runnels stated that Luna was as weird as he was, and that he loved her and would Miss her.
 Of the 1,400 people who were surveyed for the 2010 Federal election,
 Demissionair Prime Minister Julia Gillard said during the campaign for the Federal election of two thousand and ten that Australia should become a Republic after the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 Thirty four percent of those polled supported this view,
 Twenty nine percent of respondents said that Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible,
 The Olympic gold medallist swam the 100 and 200 metre freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth games, but his condition was questioned because of his complaints.
 He couldn't take the medication he needed to relieve his pain because it was banned at the games.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of central Missouri, discovered on January twenty five,
 Several people verified the discovery by the end of February using different hardware and software and this was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets could have been a source of water and organic material that formed proteins and supported life.
 Scientists hope to gain insight into how planets are formed,
 Cuomo, who was sworn in as governor this year, signed a law last month that legalized same-sex marriage.
 He called the rumors, political nonsense and gossip.
 It is speculated that he will run for President in 2016.
 With the NextGen system, the FAA says, planes could take shorter routes, saving millions of tons of fuel each year and reducing carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite-based technology, as opposed to older technologies with ground-based radars,
 There is no additional transportation and no above-ground trains at Wembley, and the parking lots and the P and R are not accessible on the site.
 A possible lack of transportation made it more likely that the game would be played behind closed doors and without supporters.
 A study published Tuesday in the scientific Journal, science,
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden,
 Gold can be worked into many forms.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire that can be twisted and woven, or it can be forged into a thin sheet that can be wound or rolled into plates.
 Once it is made very thin, it can be pasted on to another metal, and it can even be made so thin that it is used for the decoration of hand-painted illustrations in books,
 This is called the pH value of a chemical.
 The color of the cabbage juice changes based on the pH level of the chemical.
 And the pH value is given by the number of Hydrogen ions,
 Hydrogen atoms consist of one proton and one electron, and hydrogen ions are protons without electrons.
 Mix both dry powders together, make your hands wet and clean, and make a ball of it.
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, creating a sort of a skin.
 In the cities of Harappa and Mohenjodaro, almost every house had a flushing toilet connected to an advanced sewage system.
 There are sewerage remains found in houses in the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini.
 There were already toilets in China, Egypt and Persia in the ancient world,
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 As soon as the spacecraft receives the call, it immediately sends it back.
 The satellite is shot into space by a rocket, and scientists make use of telescopes in space, because the earth's atmosphere distorts a part of our light and our image.
 To get a satellite or telescope into space, you need a huge rocket that is more than thirty meters long.
 The wheel has changed the world immensely, the most important thing it has given us is an easier and faster transport.
 The train, the car, and many other modes of transportation are the result of this.
 There are medium-sized cats that eat prey of medium size, from hares to antelopes and deer.
 In addition, there are many small cats, such as stray cats that are kept as pets,
 Their success comes from the idea of a niche, a special job that every cat has,
 Lions are the most social of all cats and live in large groups called prides.
 Troops consist of one to three adult males who are related to each other and also have up to thirty females and young.
 The women are normally closely related to each other and form a large family of sisters and daughters.
 A troop of lions behaves in a manner very similar to a pack of wolves or dogs, which are animals that look very much like lions,
 The tiger is a versatile athlete and can climb, although not well, swim, jump great distances and has five times the pull of a strong man.
 The tiger belongs to the same group as lions, leopards and jaguars,
 A tiger does not roar with full force like a lion, but more as if he were growling a whole sentence.
 Ocelots are carnivorous, and their favorite meal is small animals,
 Scholars suspect that ocelots use their sense of smell to hunt small animals by smelling where they have been.
 They can see very well in the dark and move about very stealthily,
 When a small group of organisms breaks away from the large population from which it originated,
 In this new environment, other raw materials and other enemies come forward, so the new population has to adapt or to adjust itself to the new environment.
 Because they still need the same adaptations as before, the original population has not changed at all.
 As the newcomers began to adapt to their new surroundings, they also began to look less and less like the other people.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will be so different in appearance that you could no longer call them the same species.
 This process is called speciation and is simply the formation of new species.
 Plants produce oxygen that people breathe in and they absorb carbon dioxide that people breathe out.
 Through photosynthesis, plants get their nutrients from the sun, and they also provide shade.
 Our houses and clothes are made from plants, we eat plants,
 The Mosasaurus stood at the top of the food chain at that time,
 His long jaws had more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus an extra set in his throat, which means that nothing or no one could escape him.
 It's not certain, but it's possible that his tongue was forked,
 In the water, even the biggest dinosaurs like the Tyrannosaurus Rex were no match for him.
 Although most of their food would be familiar to us, the Romans also had their share of strange or unusual delicacies, including boar, peacock, snails, and a rodent called a Sleeper.
 In addition, there was a difference in the way that poor people and women sat during meals,
 Meals in the Roman Empire did not include foods that were brought to Europe from the Americas or Asia.
 They didn't have maize, tomatoes, potatoes, cacao,
 The Babylonians made a primary temple for each of their gods.
 Men brought offerings to the gods and the priests tried to meet the needs of the gods by organizing ceremonies and festivals.
 Every temple had a public courtyard and a back room that was only accessible to priests.
 Sometimes as part of the temple, there were also pyramid-shaped towers called Ziggurats.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 Houses were not of great importance in the warm climate of the Middle East.
 The daily life of the Hebrew family took place mostly outdoors.
 Women cooked in the garden, and shops were little more than a counter along the street.
 In the land of Canaan, there were no large forests, and therefore wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland had few inhabitants, and according to Norse Sagas, Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder,
 He made this discovery, but at that time there were already Eskimo tribes living there.
 Although all were Scandinavian, the people, the Royal family, customs, and history of Sweden, Iceland, Denmark, and Norway were all very different.
 You may have seen the movie National Treasure and thought that there was a treasure map hidden behind the Declaration of Independence.
 There is a note on the back, but it's not a treasure map.
 On the back of the American Declaration of Independence, it says,
 Although no one is certain who wrote it, it is certain that the large parchment, which is 29¾ inches by 24½ inches,
 It seems that the term was simply added as a label.
 Thanks to the D-Day landings and the fighting that followed, the North of France was liberated,
 It was governed by Vichy France, which was a group of French people who sided with the Nazis instead of fighting against them.
 On August fourteen, nineteen forty, the Allies invaded Southern France.
 The Americans and the Free French had liberated Southern France in just two weeks,
 A civilization is a single culture that is shared by a large group of people who live and work together in a society.
 From the Latin civilis, which means civil, comes the term civilization, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or town,
 States are the forerunners of nations, a civilization suggests that knowledge is passed on through generations, a permanent cultural footprint and evenly distributed.
 When minority cultures disappear, they often leave no relevant historical evidence behind,
 During the revolution, thirteen States, under the articles of Confederation,
 The Congress lacked the power to levy taxes, because there was no national executive or judicial authority,
 It also did not have the power to enforce tax laws and tariffs between the States.
 First, all the States had to unanimously agree to the articles before they could be amended, but the States did not take the national government so seriously that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is, together with the German team, the second most successful team in the world,
 Popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, fencing, water polo, fencing, Rugby, Cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and F1 motor racing.
 Winter sports are especially popular in the northern regions, where Italians compete in international and Olympic events.
 Japan consists of nearly 7,000 Islands,
 Because of the cluster of Islands that Japan is made up of,
 The history of Taiwan begins in the fifteenth century, when sailors from Europe sailed past the island and gave it the name Ilha Formosa, or beautiful Island.
 In sixteen twenty four, the Dutch East India company established a base in the Southwest of Taiwan,
 In the year 1683, the Western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan were conquered by the Qing dynasty,
 After the defeat in the first Sino-Japanese war in 1895,
 Built up from three large constructions, the Intihuatana, the temple of the sun and the three windows,
 Most of the buildings at the edges of the complex have been rebuilt so that tourists can get a better idea of how they looked before.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu was restored.
 For example, the most common still photography film format worldwide is 35 mm, which was the usual film format in the late period of the analogue film era.
 These are still produced to this day, although it is primarily the ratio of the image that the digital camera's image sensor has inherited.
 The film is actually 36 mm wide, with a height of 24 mm.
 The ratio of the two sizes would be three to two,
 Many common indelings, for example, APS-like indelings,
 The rule of thirds, which is often ridiculed by many, is a simple guideline that makes the image dynamic,
 The most effective place for the main subject is at the intersection of the lines, so you divide the image vertically and horizontally into three parts.
 In this period of history, the rich and powerful Catholic Church was under fire.
 For more than a thousand years, it has united European states, despite differences in language,
 From the King to the commoner, his all-pervading power had an effect on everyone.
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the church has resources for this purpose.
 The church had been the central authority in Rome for over a thousand years, and this imbalance of power and money led many people to question whether this principle was being upheld.
 Britain imposed a blockade on the sea,
 The strategy proved effective, because it was no longer possible to deliver vital supplies to civilians and soldiers,
 Britain has placed mines in international waters, so that no ships, even neutral ships, could sail in whole parts of the ocean.
 Because of the limited response to this tactic, Germany expected a similar response to the unrestricted U-Boat warfare.
 During the nineteen twenty s, most people and nations had a pacifist and isolationist attitude.
 After the first World War, nations wanted to prevent such horrors from ever happening again.
 Tesla emigrated to the United States in 1884 to work at the Edison company in New York City.
 When he came to the United States, he had only four cents, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 The old China had a unique way of representing different periods of time,
 Also between the different dynasties, there was an unstable period in which the provinces were divided.
 In those days, there were fierce wars between different nobles who were fighting for the throne.
 In the history of ancient China, the period of the three kingdoms is one of the bloodiest.
 The Revolution had large social and political consequences, such as the use of the metric system, a shift from absolute Monarchy to Republicanism, nationalism,
 For all male applicants, there were positions to be filled after the revolution, so that the most ambitious and the most suitable candidates could succeed.
 The same is true for the Army, where the ranks are no longer based on a person's class,
 The French Revolution inspired the underprivileged working class in other countries to revolt as well.
 He spent a lot of time in a cave in the mountains of Noer, which is now called the cave of Hira.
 The cave itself, which has withstood the test of time, gives a very vivid picture of the spirituality of Muhammad.
 The cave is located on one of the mountains on the North side of Mecca and is completely sealed off from the rest of the world.
 Even though the cave was known to exist, it was not at all easy to find.
 The only thing to be seen is the clear, beautiful sky and the many surrounding mountains.
 The only one of the seven wonders of the world that still stands is the great pyramid of Giza.
 The great pyramid was built in the third century BC by the Egyptians to honor a deceased pharaoh.
 The plateau of Giza or the Giza plateau in the Egyptian valley of the Kings contains several pyramids,
 The great pyramid was built to honor Pharaoh Khufu,
 The up-bow sign looks like a V and the down-bow sign looks like a V with the bottom of the V missing.
 Above means that you start at the point and push the bow away,
 An upward movement usually gives a softer sound, while a downward movement produces a stronger and more assertive sound.
 Take the liberty to sketch your personal signs, but do not forget that the printed staff marks are there for a musical reason,
 A group of market women sat on October 6, 1789, behind the departing Louis XVI, Marie Antoinette and their two young children,
 They drove back to the French capital in a carriage, surrounded by jeering and threatening mobs that threatened the King and queen.
 The crowd was so large that the King and queen were forced to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 At one point, a man in the crowd held up the head of a Royal guard who had been murdered in Versailles,
 The war costs of the U S . imperialism in the conquest of the Philippines have been paid by the people of the Philippines.
 They were imposed on the U S . colonial regime to pay for a large part of the costs and the interest on the bonds was issued through the banks on Wall Street in the name of the Philippine government.
 American imperialism rested in large part on the long-term exploitation of the Philippines.
 To understand the Templars, one must know the context that gave rise to the order.
 The period of time in which this happened is commonly referred to as the high Middle Ages, the European history of the 11th, 12th, and 13th centuries.
 After the early Middle Ages came the high Middle Ages, which were in turn followed by the late Middle Ages, which usually end around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term for a wide assortment of ideas in practice: from technology supply or the technological imperative to a strict sense that human destiny is driven by an underlying logic that is linked to scientific laws and the appearance of them in technology.
 The two most common interpretations of technological determinism are that the development of technology follows a path that is largely beyond cultural or political influence,
 Some will say, for example, that the advent of the automobile automatically leads to the building of roads.
 A national road network is not economically viable for more than a few cars, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 The massive car ownership also leads to more accidents on the road and this leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health care to repair the human body.
 In the romanticism, a large part of cultural determinism was included, which came from writers like Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the Romanticism, geography formed the individual and over time, customs and cultures emerged from this geography,
 Constantinople was the fashion capital of feudal Europe,
 It stood from about 400 to about 1100 as a center of luxury.
 The status of the Empire declined in the twelfth century, primarily because the Crusaders returned with silks and spices that were more valuable than what the Byzantine markets could offer.
 Around this time, Paris also took over the title of fashion capital from Constantinople.
 The Gothic period flourished in the 10th, 11th and 14th centuries.
 Clothing was at first strongly influenced by the Byzantine culture from the East.
 And the slow communication channels meant that styles in the West were 25 to 30 years behind.
 At the end of the Middle Ages, a new style began to develop in Western Europe, one of the biggest developments was the result of the Crusades,
 Self-sufficient agriculture is agriculture whereby enough food is produced to meet the needs of the farmer and his family.
 Agriculture, with a view to subsistence, is a simple system that is usually biological,
 And in many developing countries, this is still the case.
 Subcultures are groups of people who feel alienated by mainstream society,
 Subcultures may be distinguished by age, ethnicity, social class, location, and or gender of their members.
 A subculture can be defined by one or more of these factors,
 Members of a subculture often show which group they belong to by a certain symbolic style in what they wear,
 One of the most used methods of illustrating the importance of socialization was the few unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune or willful misuse,
 Some of these children were locked up by their own parents, or were abandoned because of the severe mental or physical disability.
 Unruly children may have experienced serious child abuse or a serious trauma before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Some people say that they were raised by animals, and some people say that they only lived in the wilderness.
 A wild child who is not raised by humans may exhibit behavior that is similar to the behavior of the animal it was raised by,
 Learning on a project basis should simplify and make education more interesting, but scaffolding goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a teaching method but a tool to support individuals who are dealing with a new learning experience, for example, a new computer program or who are starting a new project.
 Support can be both virtual and real . A teacher is one form of support, but the paperclip man of Microsoft office is as well.
 There is built-in virtual scaffolding that asks questions, provides memory aids, and explains procedures that may be difficult to understand without help.
 There are several reasons that children end up in the foster care system, such as neglect, abuse, and exploitation.
 No child should grow up in an environment where they are not well cared for, where they are not loved, where they are not nurtured,
 We see the foster care system as a safe zone for these children.
 It is the job of the foster care system to provide a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education, and reliable health care.
 In foster care, all the needs that were neglected in the earlier home must be met.
 On the Internet, components of interpersonal and mass communication are merged.
 The different characters of the Internet lead to new dimensions in the application of the Uses and Gratifications theory.
 Learning and socialization are cited as important reasons for using the Internet.
 Eighmey and McCord introduced new motivation aspects such as personal involvement and ongoing relationships when they investigated the public's responses to Websites.
 The use of Video-Recordings has led to some remarkable discoveries in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions,
 It is said that no one can detect a lie by focusing on micro-expressions alone.
 Oliver Sacks described in his essay the President's Speech how people who cannot understand speech due to brain damage can nevertheless accurately gauge its sincerity.
 He even suggested that other animal species, such as dogs,
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two groups of genetic Variants,
 Mutation adds new genetic variation to the pool of expressed variation,
 For each generation, there is a variation between the two groups by means of separation and re-combination.
 A primate with a digestive system that resembles that of humans can thrive in the savanna but has difficulty getting the amino acids it needs from the plant sources available there.
 Further non compliance can have serious consequences, including stunted growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The easiest to find vegetable sources are the proteins in leaves and legumes,
 Not only is animal food lightly digestible,
 All in all, we should not be surprised if our ancestors solved their protein problem in the same way that chimpanzees solve it on the savannah today.
 Sleep disturbance is when you wake up for a reason during your normal sleep period and then fall back to sleep within a short period of time,
 This is fairly easy to do by using a relatively soft alarm clock that will bring you back to your consciousness without immediately waking you up.
 If you set your clock while you are in bed,
 Other options based on the biorhythm are, for example, drinking a lot of fluid before going to bed,
 The amount of inner calm that a person has is in direct proportion to the amount of stress that a person is carrying in his or her body and mind.
 The more you are in a state of tension, the more you are in a state of stress, the more you are in a state of fear,
 Everyone can enlighten his or her mind. Only your own stress and negativity stand in the way.
 The Tibetan form of Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha,
 The Tibetan form of Buddhism consists of a relatively simple core of Kundalini yoga, meditation, and a following of universal love.
 Through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualized images, the energy of Kundalini-Yoga is awakened.
 The core of Tibetan meditation is yoga with a deity as the focus,
 Because Germany was a common enemy in the second World War,
 The former allies were now on opposite sides, and the cold war had begun.
 The war would last for 40 years and there were proxy wars on battlefields in Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 The Polish defensive forces held out until the nineteenth of September,
 These plans were however, in one night, overturned, when 800,000 soldiers from the Soviet Union,
 Shipping goods by ship is the most efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the ocean.
 Traditionally, it's the job of the Navy to make sure that a country has the ability to transport people and goods,
 The U S . tried to get troops and material across the Atlantic to the British, and this is one of the most remarkable recent examples.
 The German Navy tried to stop this traffic at the same time with U-Boats.
 Like the rest of Europe, Britain would probably have been in German hands if the Allies had failed.
 It is believed that goats were first domesticated in the Zagros mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 In the olden times, cultures and tribes started keeping them so that they could always easily get her, meat, milk and skins.
 Gomangani were usually kept in herds on a hill or other grazing ground,
 Already in the sixteenth century, in England,
 Although horse railways consisted only of a rail of planks, the horses had to travel ever faster and to pull ever larger quantities than on the somewhat difficult roads of that time.
 Dwarsbalken were used quite early on to keep the rails in place, but it was soon realised that rails would be more efficient if they had an iron point at the top.
 This became the standard practice, but the iron resulted in more wear and tear on the wooden coach wheels.
 Iron wheels eventually replaced the wooden varieties,
 The first form of transportation we know is walking,
 Their predecessor, Australopithecus, walked upright less often.
 In the Australopithecus of 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago,
 We can live in a more environmentally friendly way, join an environmental movement, or even take action to mitigate future environmental harm.
 It is in many cases just like a symptomatic treatment, but if we want more than a temporary solution, we have to address the root causes.
 The scientific and technological developments of human society have obviously changed the earth greatly.
 And the Declaration of Independence was sent to the printer John Dunlap's shop a few blocks away,
 Between one hundred and two hundred copies were made during the night, and are now better known as the Dunlap broadsides.
 John Nixon held the public reading of the document for the first time on July eight in the garden of Independence hall.
 One copy was sent to George Washington on July 6 and read to his troops in New York on July 9,
 The 25 Dunlap-Flugschriften are the oldest surviving copies of the document,
 Many paleontologists believe that there is still a dinosaur species alive today.
 Many people do not consider them to be dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are many things about birds that still make us think of dinosaurs.
 On their feet are claws and scales, they lay eggs and walk on their two hind legs, just like the Tyrannosaurus Rex.
 Manipulating data that is coded in Binary forms the basis for almost all computers that are in use today.
 A Binary number can have only two values, zero or one, and these numbers are called Binary digits, or Binary digits.
 Internal poisoning is possible, but symptoms such as vomiting are so common that they do not immediately point to a diagnosis.
 The presence of open boxes of medication or toxic household chemicals is the best indication of internal poisoning.
 Check the label for specific first aid instructions for that particular poison.
 Entomologists formally call these insects bugs.
 This term comes from an age-old agreement with bed bugs, which are insects that can parasitize very well on the human being.
 Both red and bed bugs are nest-bound, they have adapted to live in the nest or the house of their host.
 In the USA, there are around 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the most common neurological condition in adults of both younger and middle age.
 The disease affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord and optic nerve.
 Research has shown that women are twice as likely to get MS as men.
 A couple may decide that it is not in their best interest, or that of their child,
 These couples can choose to give their baby up for adoption.
 In an adoption, the parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The scientific method is the most important tool for the scientific community.
 But it's more than just a test to rule out or to place question marks or to make observations,
 Naturalists and philosophers turned to classical texts, and especially to the Bible in Latin.
 The views of Aristotle on the subject of science, including psychology, were accepted.
 The West understood less and less of the Greek philosophy and science as the knowledge of the Greek language declined.
 In physiological and behavioral observations of rhythms, there is often a strong dependence on endogenous processes and the production via the biological clock.
 Most living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals,
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that go through a cycle for a certain period of time, even if there are no external signals to trigger it.
 The Hershey and Chase experiment was one of the most important clues that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophage or viruses to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 Two experiments were performed in the first experiment, the DNA in the phage was tagged with a radioactive phosphorus,
 Mutations can have many different effects, depending on the type, the importance of the genetic material involved, and whether the affected cells are dividing or not.
 Only mutations in Kiemba cells are hereditary,
 Nature tourism attracts people who like to visit natural areas for the sake of enjoying the scenery, including the flora and fauna.
 You can go hunting, fishing, bird watching, hiking, and you can study the ecosystem.
 An example is a visit to, photographing and learning about the orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people from small towns go to their workplaces by car and pass people whose workplaces are located in the town from which they have just come.
 Everyone in this dynamic transportation shuttle is in some way connected to and supported by a private car based transportation system.
 The science shows that through this great carbon economy, the biosphere is no longer in the stable state that allowed human evolution to take place over the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in the society and uses transportation systems, and almost everyone complains about it.
 In developed countries, problems with water quality or collapsing bridges are rare.
 So how is it that so many transport systems go wrong, why do transport technicians fail?
 A traffic flow is a study of the movements of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions that take place between the individuals.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to predict the behaviour of drivers with 100% certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers behave in a fairly predictable way, which means that traffic flows show some degree of consistency, and that there is something to be said about this in mathematical terms.
 There are three core properties that are linked to better representation of traffic flow,
 With the help of these relationships, it is easier to plan, design and operate road engineering facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to fly,
 The advantage of most insects is that they can fold their wings along the body.
 This allows them to hide in a larger number of small places from predators.
 At the moment, only dragonflies and mayflies cannot fold their wings.
 A few thousand years ago, Aristarchus said that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 There were some people who thought he was right, but many people believed the opposite, that the sun and the stars moved around the earth.
 This sounds like a reasonable rule, because you don't feel the earth moving, do you?
 The Amazon is the world's largest and second longest river, and it carries more than eight times the volume of water as the second largest.
 The Amazon is also the widest River on earth and at some points is six miles wide.
 Approximately twenty percent of all the water that flows into the ocean from the rivers comes from the Amazon.
 The main stream of the Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long.
 Although the building of stone pyramids continued until the end of the old Kingdom,
 The ancient Egyptians of the new Kingdom admired the monument of their predecessors,
 There are about eight hundred people living in Vatican city, which is the smallest independent country in the world,
 Italian is the official language for the Vatican's official communications and laws.
 Italian is the most widely spoken language by the people who work there, while Latin is used during religious ceremonies.
 Everyone who lives in the Vatican is Roman Catholic.
 People have known the most basic chemical elements, such as gold, silver and copper,
 The philosopher Aristotle speculated that everything is made up of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air and fire.
 This seemed more like the four states of matter we are familiar with in the same order: solid, liquid, gas and plasma,
 Legerings are, in a way, a combination of at least two metals.
 Elements like calcium and potassium fall under the metals,
 Alloys can also contain a small amount of Non-Metal elements, for example, carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made up of matter,
 Atoms are so incredibly small that there are a trillion atoms in the tip at the end of this sentence.
 And so the pencil was a friend to many people when it was first introduced.
 The pen has, as new writing methods have been developed,
 Today, we write messages on a computer screen without ever needing a typewriter.
 You might wonder what's going to happen to the keyboard once something new comes on the market.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that it takes energy to put together a nucleus with many protons and neutrons.
 It's like pushing a heavy car up a hill,
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus, which means that they fall apart at the slightest provocation.
 The surface of the moon is characterized by dust and rock. The crust is the outer layer of the moon.
 The crust is about 70 km thick at the nearest point and about 100 km thick at the farthest point.
 The crust is thinner under the Maria and thicker under the highlands.
 There may be more mares on the side, because the crust is thinner there, and lava could have come to the surface more easily.
 Content theories are concerned with trying to understand what moves and attracts people.
 This theory suggests that people have certain needs and or desires that are internalized as they grow up.
 With these theories, they want to examine the reasons why certain people want certain things and what environmental factors influence them to do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Hertzberg's motivation-hygiene theory.
 In general, there are two ways that managers try to lead their former colleagues.
 This type of manager finds it difficult to make unpopular decisions and to take disciplinary measures, to have evaluation interviews, to delegate, and to hold people accountable.
 On the other side of the spectrum,
 And ultimately, the leader is responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 This often leads to a rift between the leaders and the team members.
 Virtuele teams must meet the same standards of excellence as normal teams, although there are some minor differences.
 In most cases, virtual team members are the first point of contact for their direct physical group.
 Often, they are more independent than traditional team members, because their teams can meet across different time zones, which may not be understood by their local management.
 The idea of a truly invisible team is a unique element of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the management team to whom each member reports,
 Why would an organization want to begin the time-consuming process of setting up a learning organization?
 Creativity and resourcefulness come to the fore when all the resources available to an organization are effectively put to use.
 The result of this is that the process of an organization that is working together to overcome a hurdle can lead to a new and innovative process to meet the needs of the customer.
 In order to make innovation possible in an organization, the management must stimulate a culture where innovation, shared knowledge, and organizational learning are central.
 According to Angel,
 Neurobiological data provides physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition,
 The correlation between the pathology of the brain and behavior helps scientists during their research.
 It has long been known that different types of brain injury, trauma, wounds and tumors can affect behavior and lead to changes in mental ability.
 And we are learning more and more about the structures and processes in the brain.
 This gives us a lot of information and material to develop Simulations,
 AI is also an essential part of computer science,
 The development of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior falls under the umbrella of ai research.
 Some examples are management, planning, the ability to answer questions and queries from customers, and the ability to recognise handwriting, voice and face.
 These have become separate disciplines for finding solutions to problems in real life.
 Nowadays, this system of artificial intelligence is widely used in the economic, medical, technological and military fields,
 For each class, many field trips are planned,
 And thanks to technological developments,
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great way to look back on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, each year, students at Bennett school in North Carolina design a Website about their trip to the state's capital,
 Blogs can also help students to write better, because often their grammar and spelling is not very good at the beginning, but it improves quickly because they have an audience.
 Because students are often the most critical audience, the Blogger strives to improve the writing and avoid criticism.
 Blogging also forces students to learn more about the world around them.
 Blogging is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to extend learning beyond the traditional school day.
 When used appropriately, Blogs can help students develop critical thinking skills and help them find their own place in the context of other people's material while at the same time helping them to develop their own point of view on certain issues.
 The bilingual capital of Canada is the charming Ottawa, full of art galleries and museums that showcase Canada's past, present and future.
 Further South you'll find Niagara falls, and further North you'll find the beautiful, untouched Muskoka.
 This sort of thing makes Ontario typical of Canada in the eyes of outsiders.
 Further North, there are large areas of sparse population, and a large part of these areas are virtually uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that will surprise many,
 The East African Islands are located along the East Coast of Africa in the Indian ocean.
 Madagascar is by far the largest, and in terms of fauna, it's almost a separate continent.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent countries or are connected to France and are known as luxurious Beach resorts.
 The Arabs also took the Islamic faith with them, and it spread widely on the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The Portuguese explorer Vasco Da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India, which marked the beginning of European influence and colonization in the fifteenth century.
 The region is bordered on the South by the Atlantic ocean,
 Women are advised to say they are married, whether or not they are.
 It also helps to do rings around it.
 Women should be aware that cultural differences may lead to behavior that they may see as intimidating and that it is customary to be followed, to be touched,
 Be clear when you reject a man and do not be afraid to stand up for yourself.
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded in the tenth century BC by Berber fishermen,
 The Portuguese destroyed the port and rebuilt it under the name of Casa Branca,
 The Sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city and named it Daru l-Bayad,
 In Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting places to shop.
 Around the old Medina you'll find many places where you can buy traditional Moroccan things, like tagines, pots, leather goods, water pipes and other knickknacks, but it's all very much aimed at tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of Congo,
 In two thousand and two, the Nyiragongo volcano erupted,
 Although Goma itself is relatively safe, you have to check the state of affairs regarding the fighting in North Kivu province.
 In addition to this, the city is the base for the Nyiragongo volcano and some of the cheapest trips for mountain gorilla tracking in Africa.
 You can get around on a boda-boda, a motorcycle taxi, for about five hundred Congolese francs.
 Timbuktu is relatively inaccessible and is nowadays used as a metaphor for exotic, far-off places.
 Today, Timbuktu is a dilapidated city, although its reputation makes it a tourist attraction and it has an airport.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites.
 It was one of the most important stops on the PBS exhibition,
 The city differs from the other cities in the country, because it has a more Arabic appearance than an African one.
 The Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa and runs along the border with Mozambique in the North,
 The park is 19,500 square kilometres in size, divided into fourteen different eco-zones,
 As a major tourist attraction in South Africa, this park is the flagship of the South African National Parks.
 As with all South African national parks, there are daily conservation fees and entrance fees.
 It can also be useful to buy a Wild Card, which gives you access to certain parts of the parks in South Africa or to all the national parks in South Africa.
 The whole of Hong Kong is named after the island of Hong Kong, and that is considered by many tourists as the most important place.
 The sheer number of buildings that make up the skyline of Hong Kong is already compared to a glittering bar graph that is visible thanks to the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 For the best view of Hong Kong, you'll want to leave the island and head to the waterfront of Kowloon on the other side.
 The vast majority of the population of Hong Kong lives very close to each other on reclaimed land along the northern coast.
 And so, this is where the British colonists settled, so if you're looking for evidence of the British colonial past of the area,
 The Sundarbans are the largest Mangrove forests in the world, extending 80 km from the coast into the Indian and Bengali interior.
 The Sundarbans are now officially on the UNESCO world heritage list,
 The forests, however, are more than just Mangrove swamps they also contain some of the last great tracts of jungle that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 square kilometres, of which a third is peat and marshland.
 The Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary since 1966, and are now home to an estimated 400 Bengal tigers and around 30,000 Axis deer.
 Buses leave from the station at the border of the districts, mostly between 6.30 and 7.30 am,
 It is wise to buy a ticket a few days earlier, because the local buses are often full.
 In most of the neighborhoods, small Japanese Coaster-Buses are used, which are comfortable and robust.
 With shared taxis, one can travel quickly and comfortably to nearby places, such as Paro and Punakha.
 The Oyapock-Bridge is a Cable-Stayed bridge that crosses the Oyapock River to connect the Brazilian city of Oiapoque and the French-Guyanese city of Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock.
 The two towers have a height of 83 meters, and the building has a length of 378 meters and has two passages with a width of 3.50 meters.
 The bridge was opened to traffic in March 2017, but the construction was completed in August 2011.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational in September 2017, and the Brazilian customs posts are expected to be ready for use by that time.
 The Guaraní was the most prominent indigenous group, living in the area that is now East Paraguay,
 In the province of Chaco, other indigenous tribes lived, including the Guaycurú and Payaguá, who found their food by hunting, fishing and gathering.
 Paraguay, formerly also called the great province of Indies, originated in the sixteenth century when Spanish colonists encountered the indigenous population.
 There followed a three hundred year period of Spanish colonization.
 Asuncion was founded in 1537 and has since then retained much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 In December, the largest tournament of the year takes place on the polo fields in Las Cañitas.
 There are also smaller tournaments and matches held at other times of the year.
 Check the Asociación Argentina de Polo for more information about tournaments and buying tickets for polo games.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound.
 On the Islands, there is only one bank, namely in Stanley opposite the shop FIC West.
 In general, British pounds are accepted everywhere on the Islands, and in Stanley you can also often pay with credit cards and American dollars.
 On the remote Islands, you probably can't pay with a credit card, but you can probably pay with the British and the American currency.
 Exchange your money back before you leave the Islands, because Falkland Islands currency is very difficult to exchange.
 Montevideo is below the equator, so when it's summer there, it's winter on the other side of the world.
 Montevideo is in the subtropics. In the summer months, temperatures can reach higher than 30°C.
 The winter can be deceptively cold the temperature rarely goes below zero,
 The rainfall level stays about the same throughout the year, without any recognizable wet and dry periods.
 Many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, but wild animals are still wild.
 In the park, keep at least 100 meters away from bears and wolves, and 25 meters away from all other wildlife.
 Elk, bison, Reindeer, bears and about all other large animals can attack you, no matter how tame they may seem.
 Every year, dozens of visitors get hurt because they don't keep a proper distance.
 And bears and other wildlife are attracted by the smell of food, so avoid wearing or cooking of smelly foods and keep the campsite clean.
 The capital of Samoa is Apia and the city with almost 40,000 inhabitants is located on the island of Upolu.
 Around the year 1850, Apia was founded and it has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, seven ships from Germany, the United States and Great Britain,
 With the exception of a British battleship, all the ships were sunk, and nearly two hundred Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 In the independence struggle, the highest leader, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, was killed in a hand-to-hand fight in the town.
 There are many beaches, notably around the two harbours of Auckland,
 The beaches of North Shore in the Northland district stretch from North to South along the Tasman sea, from Long Bay to Devonport.
 These are nearly all sandy beaches where it is safe to swim and most have pohutukawa trees that provide shade.
 At Waitemata's harbour, in the luxury suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, located in central Auckland,
 These family beaches are sometimes crowded and have a good range of shops along the coast.
 Number one is the most important local beer, which is not a complex beer, but is pleasant and refreshing.
 There are many French wines to be found, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps better suited for traveling.
 The local drinking water can be safely drunk, but bottled water is also easily found if you don't trust it.
 A flat white is a strange concept for Australians,
 The hot chocolate is of Belgian quality. Fruit juices are expensive, but great.
 There are tours to the Reef all year round, and injuries from these tours to the Reef are rare.
 Ask for expert advice and follow all signs and safety warnings.
 Kubuskwallen are found from October to April near beaches and river mouths north of Town of 1770,
 Sharks do come, but they rarely attack people, and most of the sharks are afraid of people and would actually swim away.
 The main habitat of saltwater crocodiles is in the river mouths north of Rockhampton, and they do not normally live in the ocean.
 Reserving in advance gives the traveller peace of mind, knowing that he or she will have a place to sleep when they arrive at their destination.
 Reisbureaus have deals with certain hotels, although you can usually book other accommodation, like a camping site,
 Travel agencies often offer packages that include the flight, the hotel and sometimes even the flight and the hotel.
 They can also hold your reservation for you if you need a little bit more time to think about the offer or if you need to get some documents for your destination.
 If you have a request or a change, you should do it through the travel agency instead of the hotel.
 For some festivals, the majority of attendees at music festivals choose to camp on site and most attendees consider this to be an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you'll need to be early to secure a camping spot near the music.
 And the same goes for the military because instead of Army rankings being based on class,
 For families with young children, there are special camping grounds at some festivals.
 Look out for your hut when you cross the Baltic in winter, for the ice makes a tremendous noise if you are too near it.
 Cruises to St . Petersburg include time to explore the city, and cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements.
 Casinos are usually set up to get the most out of the time and money that guests spend.
 They have special offers on food, drink and entertainment to keep them in a good mood and to prevent them from leaving.
 Some locations offer free alcoholic drinks, and as people get drunk, it affects their ability to make decisions, and all seasoned gamblers know that it's extremely important to stay sober.
 If you go up high into the mountains or over mountain passes, you have to keep in mind that there may be snow or ice and the temperature can be extremely low.
 On icy and snowy roads, there is little friction and it drives differently than on asphalt.
 During snowstorms, a lot of snow can fall in a very short period of time.
 Also, the visibility can be hampered by falling or blowing snow or by condensation or ice on the vehicle's windows.
 On the other hand, ice and snow are normal in many countries and do not hinder traffic.
 The largest tourist attraction in Africa is the safari, which for many visitors is the highlight of their trip.
 The word safari is used in popular usage to refer to a trip overland to see the beautiful wildlife of Africa,
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, come close to cars and a standard equipment makes a good view possible.
 If you want to see lions, cheetahs and leopards, you need a telescope.
 A walking safari, also called a Bushwalk or a Loopsafari,
 The Paralympics are from August 24 to September 5, 2021, and some of the events will be held in other locations in Japan.
 Tokyo will become the only Asian city to have hosted the Olympic games twice.
 If you had already booked a flight and accommodation for 2020 before the delay was announced,
 The cancellation policies vary, but as of the end of March, most of the cancellation policies based on the Coronavirus are no longer valid until July of two thousand and twenty,
 Tickets are expected to cost between ¥2,500 and ¥130,000,
 You can dry wet clothes by ironing them . Many hotels have an iron and ironing board available . You can often borrow these things even if they're not in the room.
 If no iron is available or if you do not want to wear ironed socks,
 Make sure the stove is not too hot, or the stove may shrink or, in extreme cases, burn.
 You can purify water in a number of ways, and some ways are effective at addressing specific risks.
 In some areas, it is sufficient to boil water for a minute, in other areas, water must be boiled for several minutes.
 Not every filter is equally effective, and in case of doubt, the best water to drink is from a sealed bottle from a trusted company.
 Travelers may encounter pests that are not found in their own country.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation or, in the worst case, cause allergic reactions, spread toxins or transmit infections.
 Normally, infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that can injure or kill people, are not considered pests.
 And the idea is that you can go to these locations and buy goods that are exempt from taxes and duties.
 Travellers going to countries with high taxes can sometimes save a lot of money on products such as alcohol and tobacco.
 Point Marion and Fairmont are connected via the Buffalo to Pittsburgh highway,
 Are you not used to driving on country roads? keep your head up, you will encounter many steep hills, narrow streets and sharp bends.
 The posted speed limits are remarkably lower than in earlier and consecutive areas,
 And it's a lot more affordable than the other places I've been to in the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German baked goods are delicious and in Bavaria, the baked goods are quite rich and varied, just like the baked goods of the neighboring country, Austria.
 You see a lot of fruit cakes, and all year round they contain apples, and in the summer months also pears and plums.
 Many popular German pastries contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts, and are delicious with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you want a few small but mighty pastries, try some that are called Berliner, Pfannkuchen, or Krapfen.
 To make a curry, you need spicy and pungent ingredients, combined with vegetables or meat.
 Depending on the amount of liquid, a curry can be either dry or wet.
 In the interior of North India and also in Pakistan, yogurt is often used in curries,
 The Indonesian cuisine encompasses cuisines from seventeen thousand Islands and is a umbrella term for a variety of regional cuisines from all over the country.
 But without additional information, the term refers to food that is originally from the central and eastern part of the main island of Java.
 The cuisine of Java is now available throughout the archipelago and offers a variety of simple, spiced dishes.
 Stirrups support the rider's feet and hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They provide the rider with more stability, but can also cause problems with safety,
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but is still hanging on by the stirrup, they can be dragged along with the horse.
 The most important thing is that the rider wears riding boots with a heel and a smooth, fairly narrow sole.
 Some saddles, and then especially English saddles, have safety stirrups,
 Cochamó Valley is the most popular climbing destination in Chile, and is known as the Yosemite of South America,
 The mountain peaks offer a breathtaking view, and climbers from all over the world are constantly discovering new routes on the rock faces, which seem to have an endless potential.
 Winter sports where you go downhill, such as skiing and snowboarding, are very popular.
 Skiing is a popular recreational activity with many enthusiasts, who are sometimes called ski bums,
 Skiing has been around for a very long time,
 The beginning of skiing dates back to at least the seventeenth century, and in eighteen sixty one the first recreational skiing area in Australia was opened by Norwegians.
 Backpacking with skis, also known as off-piste skiing, ski touring or ski hiking.
 It's not exactly the same, but it's similar to Alpine skiing or mountain climbing, which is done on steep terrain.
 You can see the ski route as a hiking route.
 In good conditions you can cover greater distances than by walking, but it rarely happens that you can reach the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy rucksack.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries.
 The Schengen area functions almost as one country in this regard.
 You can usually cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 When you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa to each and every Schengen country, which saves time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antique,
 The definition can vary from country to country,
 It is possible to register handicrafts as antiques, even though they are newer than similar mass produced items.
 For the Sámi, keeping reindeer is an important form of livelihood, and the culture around the trade is also a very important part of their lives.
 Even traditionally, however, not all Sámi were involved in large-scale reindeer husbandry,
 Many Sámi work in modern professions today, and tourism is a major source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi area.
 The word Gypsy is used primarily by Non-Roma, but is also often considered as a derogatory term due to negative stereotypes and incorrect perceptions of the Roma.
 If there is a travel advisory for the country you are going to, this can have consequences for your travel insurance or your cancellation insurance.
 You can also consult the advice of other governments, but their advice is only for their own citizens.
 So Americans in the Middle East, for example, may be confronted with different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 The advice only gives a short summary of the political situation in a single country.
 They give a fleeting, general, and extremely simplistic picture,
 A general term for any dangerous weather event that can lead to damage, serious social disruption, or loss of life.
 Weather is the state of the atmosphere at a given place and time.
 The effects and consequences of severe weather include high winds, hail, heavy rainfall, and forest fires, but also thunderstorms, tornadoes, water spouts, and hurricanes.
 Snowstorms, ice storms and dust storms are other examples of regional and seasonal extreme weather events.
 Travelers are strongly advised to be aware of the risks posed by severe weather conditions in their surroundings, as these may also affect some travel plans.
 Anyone who wants to visit a war zone should be professionally trained.
 A search on the Internet for a course in hostile environments is likely to turn up the address of a local business.
 In a course, all the issues that have been discussed are usually covered in more detail, usually in combination with practical experience.
 A course usually lasts from two to five days and consists of role plays, a lot of first aid, and sometimes weapons training.
 There are many books and magazines with articles about survival in the wilderness, but there are few publications about war zones.
 Travellers who have planned a sex change operation abroad should ensure that they have the right documentation for their return journey.
 It varies quite a lot whether governments will issue a passport without a gender marker or will allow a name or a gender marker to be changed.
 There is as much difference in the willingness of foreign governments to recognise these documents.
 And searches at security controls have become much more extensive since 11 September 2001.
 Transgender individuals who have not yet undergone surgery can assume that they will not emerge from this scanner with their privacy and dignity intact.
 Tidal currents are the recurring flow of waves that break on a Reef or something similar,
 Because of the underwater topography, the return flow is in some of the deeper parts, where a rapid current can develop.
 Most of the deaths are caused by exhaustion as they try to swim against the current,
 When you've escaped from the strong current, it's so easy to swim back.
 Try to aim for a place where you're not going to be grabbed again, depending on your skills and whether or not you've been noticed.
 The shock of returning is worse than the culture shock,
 Travellers who are easily adaptable to new cultures sometimes have difficulty in adapting to their own cultures.
 If you have lived abroad and then returned, you have adapted to the new culture and lost some of your own culture's habits.
 When you go to a foreign country,
 Most of the time, there is not expected patience and understanding for travelers returning home.
 For children, the pyramid show with light and sound is one of the most interesting activities in the neighborhood.
 You see the pyramids in the dark and you see them in silence before the show begins.
 The story of the light and the sound is like the story of a book.
 The Sphinx is the backdrop and the narrator of a long story.
 The scenes appear as projections on the pyramids and the rest of the pyramids is illuminated.
 The South Sandwich Islands were discovered in 1819 and have since been claimed by a number of countries,
 The archipelago is located 120 km north of the peninsula.
 Others are Livingston Island, and Deception,
 Ellsworth is on the Southern edge of the peninsula, at the border with the Bellingshausen Sea.
 Here the mountains of the peninsula merge into the plateau, and then reappear as the 360 km long Ellsworth mountain range, which is crossed by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, also known as the Sentinel range, includes the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson massif.
 A satellite phone can be your only option in remote locations where there is no cell phone reception.
 A satellite phone is not really a replacement for a mobile phone, since you have to be outside with a clear view of the satellite in order to make a phone call.
 This service is often used by the shipping industry, including pleasure craft, and for expeditions where there is a need for external data and communication.
 Your local phone provider can give you more information about how to connect to this service.
 It's becoming increasingly popular for people who are planning a gap year to travel and learn.
 Especially school leavers make use of this to take a gap year before going to university without any negative consequences for their education.
 Often, a study abroad experience can increase your chances of getting into a top university back home.
 Normally, there is a fee for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is a fantastic place to sail. The land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of Islands, in the lakes and in the archipelagoes off the coast.
 A yacht is not necessary for the archipelagoes or lakes.
 The archipelagoes off the coast and the largest lakes are indeed large enough for any kind of boat, but with smaller boats or even a kayak,
 In Finland, so many people go boating in their leisure time that the ratio of boats to people is one in seven or eight.
 The figure is equal to the figure of Norway, Sweden and New Zealand.
 Most Baltic cruises include a long stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 You can spend several full days in the historic town and then stay overnight on the ship.
 Since 2009, you do not need a separate visa if you only go ashore during a boat excursion.
 Some cruises include a visit to the German capital, Berlin, but as you can see on the map, Berlin is not close to the sea.
 Air travel can be daunting for people of all backgrounds and ages, especially if they've never flown before or if they've had a traumatic experience.
 It's not something to be ashamed of, it's not different from many other fears that other people have.
 If you know how airplanes work, it can help to take away a fear that comes from the unknown or from not having control over the airplane.
 Courier companies are paid a generous fee to deliver items quickly. For business documents, shopping or spare parts for an urgent repair, time is often a very important factor.
 Larger companies could use their own planes for certain routes, but for other routes it was more difficult.
 If they are shipping things by air, it can take days for them to be unloaded and go through customs.
 Only as checked baggage could it be processed more quickly,
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is by paying for this privilege with a bag of money.
 But this is not cheap . The rule of thumb is that you pay about four times economy class for business,
 It is usually not worthwhile to look for discounts on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know all too well that there is a group of flyers who are prepared to pay a lot of money to fly somewhere quickly and comfortably and the airlines charge them accordingly.
 Chişinău is the capital of Moldova,
 As a Multi-Ethnic Republic, Moldova was plagued by an ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria in the east of Moldova,
 There are new economic ties between these two parts of Moldova, even though the political negotiations have failed.
 Orthodox Christianity is the main religion in Moldova.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of around three point seven million,
 The once ancient city of Izmir is now a modern, developed, and busy commercial center on a Bay, and is surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, the glass buildings and the modern shopping centers that are covered with red tiles, the 18th century markets,
 In the village of Haldarsvik, you enjoy views of the island of Eysturoy, which is right next door,
 On a number of graves at the church are interesting marble dovecot sculptures.
 If you have half an hour, you should go and have a look around this village.
 In the North, you have the easily accessible, romantic, and fascinating town of Sintra,
 Scotturb-bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra, with a stop in Cabo da Roca.
 Go also to the North and see the beautiful Shrine of Our Lady of Fatima,
 But remember that you are actually just visiting a mass grave, but also a place that has a meaning for a large part of the world's population.
 Many men and women who have survived their time here are still alive, and many of them have loved ones who were murdered or who have died of a broken heart.
 Show all appropriate respect, solemnity and dignity during your visit.
 Do not damage the site by marking or graffiti on the buildings.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the inhabitants prefer Catalan, the great majority can understand it, and almost everyone can speak it.
 But most of the signs are in Catalan, because that's the first official language,
 In public transport and other facilities, Spanish is spoken quite frequently.
 The announcements in the Metro are only in Catalan, but the unscheduled interruptions are done by an automated system in different languages, including French, Arabic, Spanish, and also in Japanese.
 The people of Paris are known to be egotistical, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is usually just a false stereotype, it can't hurt to put your best foot forward in Paris and to act like someone who is well-bred.
 The hard exterior of the Parisians disappears quickly when you show that you are familiar with their way of doing things.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested, and this heavily forested area consists primarily of beech, fir and pine,
 There are a great many different plant communities,
 This area is also the habitat of a very wide range of animal and bird species.
 There are rare animals such as the European Brown bear, the Wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the wild cat and the Auerhoen,
 When women visit a monastery, they are required to wear a skirt to the knee and their shoulders must be covered.
 Most of the time you get a towel as a woman when you arrive at a monastery, but if you bring your own,
 On the other hand, men must wear pants to at least above the knee.
 You can also borrow the clothes from the front desk, but these clothes are not washed after each use, so you may not feel comfortable with that.
 Like many other Mediterranean cuisines, the Mallorcan cuisine is based on bread, vegetables and meat,
 A simple and popular evening meal, especially during the summer months, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomatoes and whatever is available, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 The capital of Moldova is Chişinău. The local language is Romanian, but Russian is widely used.
 In this way you make a distinct difference between a number of verbs and nouns.
 Reading is probably also made easier by this, although writing is more difficult because you have to figure out whether a verb or an adjective is used as a noun.
 Most Italian words are spelled exactly as they are pronounced, so the pronunciation generally poses little problem.
 You have to pay the most attention to the c and the g. The pronunciation of those depends on the vowel that follows.
 And you also have to distinguish between the r and the R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R R
 The Persian language has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 The reading of this introduction to the grammar will teach you a lot about the grammar of Persian and will help you to understand sentences.
 It's quite logical that if you know a Romance language, it's easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 But people who speak a little bit of Spanish can easily conclude that Portuguese is so much alike that you don't have to learn it separately.
 Pre-Modern observatories are now obsolete, and serve as museums or educational sites.
 Light pollution was not as big of a problem back then as it is now, so they were often built in cities or on campuses,
 Most of the modern research telescopes are built in remote locations with favourable atmospheric conditions.
 Hanami is the viewing of cherry blossoms and this has been a part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 In China, the plum blossom was the favorite flower, and that's where the concept came from.
 The first Cherry blossom festivals of Japan were organized by the Emperor and were only for him and other aristocrats at the Imperial court.
 Plants look best in a natural setting, which makes it hard to resist removing even just one species.
 When you collect samples in a landscaped garden, you are immediately and without discussion banned from the garden.
 Singapore is, on the whole, a very safe place to be, very easy to navigate, and almost everything is available once you've arrived.
 But if you are in the high tropics, but a few degrees north of the equator,
 There are also some buses going in the northern direction to Hebron, the ancient burial place of the Biblical patriarchs Isaac, Jacob, and Abraham.
 Look carefully to see if the bus you are taking really goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good holiday destination.
 You can visit castles in the Loire Valley or the Rhine Valley,
 They also give popular walking and biking routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of the Christian religion,
 People who do not believe in Christian countries and Non-Christians around the world have also adopted many traditions that are associated with the holiday.
 There is a tradition of staying up all night long until you can see the sunrise.
 And of course, there are also Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it could just as well be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 In traditional churches, a Easter Vigil is often held on the Saturday evening of the Easter weekend,
 All the animals that originally came to the Islands,
 Because of the long distance from the continent, it was not possible for the mammals to make the journey,
 Since man set foot on the Galapagos,
 During the winter, the Arctic and Antarctic regions experience the polar night, which means that the sun does not actually rise.
 There is a good chance you will be able to see the northern lights, as the sky will be dark most of the time.
 The areas are sparsely populated and so light pollution is not a problem, which means you can also enjoy the starry sky.
 The Japanese work environment is more structured and formal than in the Western world.
 The uniforms are standard workwear and colleagues refer to each other by their last name or job title.
 Teamwork is of the utmost importance.
 Workers often need the permission of their supervisors before they can make a decision,
